Wisconsin, session 2025, SB449.
do enact as follows:SB449,11Section 1. 54.19 (8) of the statutes is amended to read:SB449,5,3254.19 (8) File, Record with the register of deeds of any county in which the 3ward possesses real property of which the guardian has actual knowledge, a sworn 1and notarized statement that specifies the legal description of the property, the 2date that the ward is determined to be incompetent, and the name, address, and 3telephone number of the ward’s guardian and any surety on the guardian’s bond.SB449,24Section 2. 59.43 (1b) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB449,5,6559.43 (1b) Definition. In this section, “legal description” means the 6description under sub. (2s) (a).SB449,37Section 3. 59.43 (1c) (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB449,5,9859.43 (1c) Register of deeds; duties Duties. (intro.) Subject to sub. (1m), 9the register of deeds shall do all of the following:SB449,410Section 4. 59.43 (1c) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB449,6,81159.43 (1c) (a) Record or cause to be recorded in suitable books to be kept in his 12or her office, correctly and legibly all deeds, mortgages, instruments, and writings 13documents submitted to the register of deeds that are authorized by law to be 14recorded in his or her office and left with him or her for that purpose, provided the 15documents have plainly printed or typewritten on the document the names of the 16grantors, grantees, witnesses, and notary. The register of deeds shall record or file 17or cause to be recorded or filed all plats and certified survey maps that are 18authorized to be accepted for recording or filing in his or her office. Any county, by 19a resolution adopted by the board, may combine the separate books or volumes for 20deeds, mortgages, miscellaneous instruments, attachments, lis pendens, sales and 21notices, certificates of organization of corporations, plats, or other recorded or filed 22instruments or classes of documents as long as separate indexes may be produced. 23Notwithstanding any other provisions of the statutes, any county adopting a system 1of microfilming or like process or a system of recording documents by optical 2imaging or electronic formatting under ch. 228 may substitute the headings, reel, 3disc, or electronic file name and microfilm image (frame) for volume and page where 4recorded and different classes of instruments may be recorded, reproduced, or 5copied on or transferred to the same reel, disc, or electronic file or part of a reel or 6disc. All recordings made prior to June 28, 1961, that would have been valid under 7this paragraph, had this paragraph then been in effect, are validated by this 8paragraph with the register of deeds.SB449,59Section 5. 59.43 (1c) (c) of the statutes is amended to read:SB449,6,131059.43 (1c) (c) State upon the record of any conveyance of real estate Subject to 11s. 77.22, indicate on conveyances the real estate transfer fee paid or, if the 12conveyance is not subject to a fee, the reason for the exemption, citing the relevant 13subsection of s. 77.25.SB449,614Section 6. 59.43 (1c) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB449,6,171559.43 (1c) (d) Keep safely permanently and maintain the documents, books, 16images of recorded documents, and indexes mentioned in this section and in s. 1784.095 in the manner required.SB449,718Section 7. 59.43 (1c) (e) of the statutes is amended to read:SB449,7,21959.43 (1c) (e) Endorse upon each instrument or writing received document 20recorded by the register for record a certificate of of deeds the date and time, hour, 21and minute when it was received, specifying the day, hour and minute of reception, 22which shall be evidence of such facts. Instruments recorded. The register of deeds 23shall be recorded record each document under this paragraph in the order in which 1they are it is received. An endorsement under this paragraph is evidence of the 2date, hour, and minute that the document was recorded.SB449,83Section 8. 59.43 (1c) (f) of the statutes is amended to read:SB449,7,8459.43 (1c) (f) Endorse plainly on each instrument document recorded by the 5register of deeds a unique number consecutive to the number assigned to the 6immediately previously recorded or filed instrument, such that all numbers are 7unique for each instrument within a group of public records that are kept together 8as a unit and relate to a particular subject document in its series.SB449,99Section 9. 59.43 (1c) (g) of the statutes is repealed and recreated to read:SB449,7,131059.43 (1c) (g) Except as provided in any agreement with the submitter, upon 11provision by the submitter of adequate postage, deliver to any person indicated as 12an authorized recipient by the submitter documents left with the register of deeds 13for recording.SB449,1014Section 10. 59.43 (1c) (h) of the statutes is amended to read:SB449,7,171559.43 (1c) (h) Register, file and index File with the state vital record system 16all marriages contracted, deaths and births occurring in the county, and domestic 17partnership terminations presented to the register of deeds for filing.SB449,1118Section 11. 59.43 (1c) (i) of the statutes is amended to read:SB449,7,221959.43 (1c) (i) Make and deliver to any person, on demand and upon payment 20of the required fees, a copy or a certified copy, with the register’s official seal of the 21register of deeds affixed, of any record, paper, file, map or plat recorded document in 22the register’s office of the register of deeds.SB449,1223Section 12. 59.43 (1c) (j) of the statutes is repealed.SB449,131Section 13. 59.43 (1c) (jm) of the statutes is created to read: Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb449 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb449 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB449 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB449 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB449: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting